src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_adverbs.lexc
LEXICON ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary
0:%>%> ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVTmp, Class: ADVTmp                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVTmp, Class: ADVTmp                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVTmp, Class: ADVTmp, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other          !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+ADVTmp: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg                                                     !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ ADVDeg_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg                                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreadverbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg                                                     !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_Stems
aapiji:aapijiw2 ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
aayaajigo:aayaajigow2 ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
agaawaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
awaach ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
awashime ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
bangiishe ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
bebangiishenh ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
deyigwaj ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
enigok ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
eniwek ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
eshkam ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
eta:etaw2 ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gagwaanisa:gagwaanisaw2 ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gechinaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gechinaaj ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gegaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gesanaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gichi-enigok ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gichi-mookomaan-akiing ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
godagiing ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gomaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
gomaapii ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inagake ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inagake-aya'ii ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inagakeyaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inakakeyaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inake ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inake-aya'ii ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
inakeya'ii ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
ingoji:ingojiw2 ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
maawaj ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
mayaa ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
mayaawaaj ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
miinange ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
naana'egaadam ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
nawaj ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
nenawaj ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
owiinge ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
wawiinge ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
wayiingwe ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
wenda:wendaw2 ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;
wiinge ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg, Class: ADVDeg                                      !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Boundary
0:%>%> ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg, Class: ADVDeg                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg, Class: ADVDeg                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVDeg, Class: ADVDeg, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other          !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVDeg_Class=ADVDeg_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+ADVDeg: EncliticRoot ;

LEXICON ADVTmp_Stems
aanapiish ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
aangwaamas ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
aapiji-dibik ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
aazha:aazhaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ajina:ajinaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ajinens ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
aname-giizhig ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
apan ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
apii ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
awas-biboonong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
awas-niibinong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
awasi-biboonong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
awasi-dibikong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
awasi-ziigwanong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
awasonaago:awasonaagow2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ayaangodinong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ayaapaapi:ayaapaapiw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ayaapiichinaag ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ayapiichinaag ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ayigwa:ayigwaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
azhigwa:azhigwaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
baamaa ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
baanimaa ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
baatayiining ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
babenag ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
bekish ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
bijiinaago:bijiinaagow2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
dagwaagong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
daso-gikinoonowin ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
dibikong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endaso-anama'e-giizhik ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endaso-dagwaagi:endaso-dagwaagiw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endaso-gigizheb ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endaso-giizis ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endaso-naawakwe ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endaso-onaagosh ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
endasonaagosh ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gaabige ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gaaginig ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-biboon ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-dagwaagi:gabe-dagwaagiw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-gigizheb ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-giizhik ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-gikinoonowin ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-naawakwe ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-onaagosh ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabe-ziigwan ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gabeya'ii ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gegabe-biboon ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gegabe-giizhig ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gegabeya'ii ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gegezhidine ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gesika:gesikaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
geyaabi:geyaabiw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gezika:gezikaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gichi-ajina:gichi-ajinaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gichi-awasonaago:gichi-awasonaagow2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gichi-ginwenzh ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gichi-wiiba:gichi-wiibaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gichi-zezika:gichi-zezikaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
giiyaabi:giiyaabiw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
gikinoonowin ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ingoding ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ishkwaaj ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ishwaaching ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
mashi:mashiw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
megwaa ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
mewinzha:mewinzhaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
midaaso-anama'e-giizhigad ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
na'idaa ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
naana'idaa ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
naanaakaw ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
naaning ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
naaningoding ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
naaningodinoo ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
naanoomaya:naanoomayaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
nayaag ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
nena'idaag ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
neningodinong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
niibaa-dibik ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
niibinong ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
niizhing ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ningo-naawakwe ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
ningodwaaching ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
nising ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
noomaya:noomayaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
oshki-gigizheb ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
pane ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
wawiiba:wawiibaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
wayiiba:wayiibaw2 ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
wiikaa ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
zhemaag ADVTmp_Class=ADVTmp_Boundary ;
